Maryland, session 2025, HB0992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
14–210.
(a) (1) Whenever the Commissioner finds that a person has violated or is about
to violate this subtitle or a regulation adopted or order passed under it, the Commissioner
may order the person to cease and desist from the further offer to sell or sale of the franchise
until the offer or sale complies with this subtitle.
(2) After passage of a cease and desist order, the alleged violator may
submit to the Commissioner a written request for a hearing.
(3) The hearing shall begin:
(i) within 15 business days after the Commissioner receives the
request for a hearing; or
(ii) at a later date, with the consent of the alleged violator.
(4) Unless there is a timely hearing, the cease and desist order is rescinded.
(b) (1) Whenever the Commissioner finds that a person has violated or is about
to violate this subtitle or a regulation adopted or order passed under it, the Commissioner
may sue in the circuit court to enjoin the violation or enforce this subtitle or the regulation
or order.
(2) The court shall:
(i) determine if a violation of this subtitle has been or is about to be
committed; and
(ii) if so, pass any order the court considers necessary to prevent the
violation or remove the effects of the violation and prevent it from continuing or being
renewed in the future.
(3) The court may exercise all equitable powers necessary for this purpose,
including:
(i) injunction;

HOUSE BILL 992 3
(ii) revocation, forfeiture, or suspension of the charter authority or
privileges of a business organization operating under the laws of the State;
(iii) dissolution of a corporation or association organized under the
laws of the State;
(iv) suspension or termination of the right of a corporation or
association organized under the laws of another state or country to do business in the State;
(v) restitution;
(vi) restraining order;
(vii) award of damages to be paid by a franchisor or subfranchisor to
a person injured by a violation of this subtitle; and
(viii) appointment of a receiver or conservator.
(4) The court may not require the Commissioner to post bond.
(c) The Commissioner may not exercise a power under this section more than [3]
5 years after the violation occurs.
14–214.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this subtitle, a person must register the offer
of a franchise with the Commissioner before the person offers to sell, through
advertisement or otherwise, or sells the franchise in the State.
(b) The registration requirement of this section does not apply to:
(1) a transaction by an executor, administrator, sheriff, receiver, trustee in
bankruptcy, guardian, or conservator;
(2) an offer to sell or sale of a franchise that is substantially similar to a
franchise already owned by the offeree or buyer; and
(3) any other transaction that the Commissioner exempts by regulation
because:
(i) the transaction is not within the purpose of this subtitle; and
(ii) the registration of the transaction is not necessary or appropriate
in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

HOUSE BILL 992
(c) (1) The registration requirement of this section does not apply to the offer
to sell or sale of a franchise by a franchisee for the franchisee’s own account, or the offer to
sell or sale of the entire area franchise owned by a subfranchisor for the subfranchisor’s
own account.
(2) A sale is not effected by or through a franchisor merely because a
franchisor has a right to approve or disapprove a different franchisee.
(d) (1) The Commissioner may require by regulation that a franchisor or
subfranchisor who claims under subsection (b)(3) of this section to be exempt from the
registration requirements of this section:
(i) file with the Commissioner a notice of claim of exemption in the
form that the Commissioner requires; and
(ii) pay a fee of $250.
(2) The franchisor or subfranchisor shall sign and verify the notice of claim
of exemption.
(E) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL REQUIRE THE FRANCHISOR NET EQUITY
AMOUNTS SET FORTH IN THE FRANCHISE REGISTRATION EXEMPTION UNDER
COMAR 02.02.08.10D.1 TO ACCOUNT FOR INFLATION OR DEFLATION BASED ON
THE CONSUMER PRICE INDEX FOR ALL URBAN CONSUMERS BY THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR.
14–227.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO:
(1) A FRANCHISEE OR FRANCHISOR WHO IS A RESIDENT OF THE
STATE; OR
(2) A FRANCHISED BUSINESS THAT OPERATES OR WILL BE OPERATED
IN THE STATE.
[(a)] (B) (1) A person who sells or grants a franchise is civilly liable to the
person who buys or is granted a franchise if the person who sells or grants a franchise offers
to sell or sells a franchise:
(i) without the offer of the franchise being registered under this
subtitle; or
(ii) by means of an untrue statement of a material fact or any
omission to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in light

HOUSE BILL 992 5
of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading, if the person who buys or
is granted a franchise does not know of the untruth or omission.
(2) In determining liability under this subsection, the person who sells or
grants a franchise has the burden of proving that the person who sells or grants a franchise
did not know and, in the exercise of reasonable care, could not have known of the untruth
or omission.
[(b)] (C) The person who buys or is granted a franchise may sue under this
section to recover damages sustained by the grant of the franchise.
[(c)] (D) A court may order the person who sells or grants a franchise to:
(1) rescind the franchise; and
(2) make restitution to the person who buys or is granted a franchise.
[(d)] (E) (1) Joint and several liability under this section extends to:
(i) each person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable
under this section;
(ii) each partner in a partnership liable under this section;
(iii) each principal officer or director of a corporation liable under this
section;
(iv) each other person that has a similar status or performs similar
functions as a person liable under this section; and
(v) each employee of a person liable under this section, if the
employee materially aids in the act or transaction that is a violation under this subtitle.
(2) However, liability under this subsection does not extend to a person
who did not have knowledge of or reasonable grounds to believe in the existence of the facts
by which the liability is alleged to exist.
[(e)] (F) An action under this section must be brought within [3] THE LATER
EARLIER OF:
(1) 5 years after the grant of the franchise; OR
(2) THE LATER OF:
(I) 3 YEARS AFTER THE GRANT OF THE FRANCHISE; OR

HOUSE BILL 992
(II) 2 YEARS AFTER THE DATE OF THE INITIAL COMMENCEMENT
OF OPERATIONS OF THE FRANCHISE OPENED TO THE PUBLIC.
14–233.
(A) A FRANCHISOR MAY NOT, DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY, THROUGH ANY
OFFICER, AGENT, OR EMPLOYEE:
(1) RESTRICT OR INHIBIT THE RIGHT OF A FRANCHISEE TO JOIN A
TRADE ASSOCIATION CONSISTING OF OTHER FRANCHISEES OF THE SAME
FRANCHISE; OR
(2) PROHIBIT THE RIGHT OF FREE ASSOCIATION AMONG
FRANCHISEES FOR ANY LAWFUL PURPOSE.
(B) (1) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MAY
BE SUED IN CIRCUIT COURT FOR:
(I) TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT INJUNCTIVE RELIEF;
(II) DAMAGES, IF ANY; AND
(III) COSTS OF THE SUIT, INCLUDING ANY REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(2) THE INJUNCTIVE RELIEF MAY BE SOUGHT FROM THE CIRCUIT
COURT IN THE COUNTY WHERE THE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS ALLEGED TO BE IN
VIOLATION OF SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION RESIDES OR THE FRANCHISE
AFFECTED BY THE VIOLATION CONDUCTS BUSINESS.
(3) WHEN SEEKING AN INJUNCTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE
PLAINTIFF MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO ALLEGE OR PROVE ACTUAL DAMAGES
SUFFERED TO OBTAIN INJUNCTIVE RELIEF.
(4) AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MUST BE BROUGHT WITHIN
THE EARLIER OF:
(I) 2 YEARS AFTER THE ALLEGED VIOLATION OCCURRED; OR
(II) 1 YEAR AFTER THE DISCOVERY BY THE PLAINTIFF OF THE
FACTS OF THE ALLEGED VIOLATION.
[14–233.] 14–234.
This subtitle is the Maryland Franchise Registration and Disclosure Law.

HOUSE BILL 992 7
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
14–219.1.
(A) THE COMMISSIONER SHALL ESTABLISH A PILOT PROGRAM TO WAIVE
EXPEDITE THE REVIEW OF THE FRANCHISE REGISTRATION RENEWAL FEE UNDER
APPLICATIONS FILED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–219 OF THIS SUBTITLE IF A
REGISTRANT, AT LEAST 60 BUSINESS NOT LATER THAN 30 CALENDAR DAYS BEFORE
AFTER THE END OF THE REGISTRANT’S FISCAL YEAR, FILES WITH THE
COMMISSIONER:
(1) A RENEWAL APPLICATION ON THE FORM THAT THE
COMMISSIONER REQUIRES;
(2) A PROSPECTUS;
(3) AN UNAUDITED FINANCIAL STATEMENT; AND
(4) DOCUMENTATION OF ANY MATERIAL CHANGES IN THE FINANCIAL
CONDITION OF THE REGISTRANT FROM THE DATE OF THE MOST RECENT AUDITED
FINANCIAL STATEMENT.
(B) ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2030, THE COMMISSIONER SHALL, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE SENATE FINANCE COMMITTEE AND THE HOUSE ECONOMIC
MATTERS COMMITTEE THAT INCLUDES:
(1) THE NUMBER AND TOTAL AMOUNT OF FRANCHISE REGISTRATION
RENEWAL FEES WAIVED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION;
(2) THE AMOUNT OF TIME REQUIRED TO ADMINISTER THE PILOT
PROGRAM, INCLUDING THE PROCESSING OF FRANCHISE REGISTRATION RENEWAL
FEES UNDER § 14–219 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(3) AN ANALYSIS OF WHETHER THERE WAS ANY IMPACT ON
REGISTRANTS WHO DID NOT QUALIFY FOR THE WAIVER OF THE FRANCHISE
REGISTRATION RENEWAL FEE UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. Section 2 of this Act shall remain effective for a period of 6 years and, at

HOUSE BILL 992
the end of September 30, 2031, Section 2 of this Act, with no further action required by the
General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.